Utah statutes.
58-60-115.   License by endorsement.
The division shall issue a license by endorsement under this chapter to a
person who:
(1)  submits an application on a form provided by the division;
(2)  pays a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(3)  provides documentation of current licensure in good standing in any
state, district, or territory of the United States to practice in the
profession for which licensure is being sought;
(4)  except as provided in Subsection (5), provides documentation that the
person has engaged in the lawful practice of the profession for which
licensure is sought for not less than 4,000 hours, of which 1,000 hours are in
mental health therapy;
(5)  if the person is applying for a license to practice as a licensed
substance abuse counselor, provides documentation that the person has:
(a)  engaged in the lawful practice of the profession for not less than 4,000
hours; and
(b)  has passed an examination approved by the division, by rule, to establish
proficiency in the profession;
(6)  has passed the profession specific jurisprudence examination if required
of a new applicant; and
(7)  is of good moral character and professional standing, and has no
disciplinary action pending or in effect against the applicant's license in
any jurisdiction.
